Utah statutes.
52-6-202.   Payment of reimbursement of attorney fees and court costs.

(1)  A request for reimbursement of attorney fees and court costs shall be filed in the manner provided in Sections 63G-7-902 and 63G-7-903.

(2) (a)  Any reimbursement of attorney fees and court costs filed on behalf of an officer or employee of the state shall be paid from funds appropriated to the department or division that employed the officer or employee at the time of the act or omission that gave rise to the indictment or information.

(b)  If those funds are unavailable, the reimbursement shall be paid from the General Fund upon approval by the Board of Examiners and legislative appropriation.

